District of Columbia statutes.
7-123

Administrative support.

The Department of Health shall assist with the administrative functions of the Mayor’s Council as feasible and as not otherwise provided.

History

Dec. 2, 2011, D.C. Law 19-58, § 4, 58 DCR 8969